Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

28-3.1-601. Courts of inquiry.

Courts of inquiry to investigate any matter may be convened by the governor.

A court of inquiry shall consist of three or more commissioned officers. For each court of inquiry, the convening authority shall also appoint counsel for the court.

Any person subject to this code whose conduct is subject to inquiry shall be designated as a party. Any person subject to this code or employed in the department who has a direct interest in the subject of inquiry has the right to be designated as a party upon request to the court. Any person designated as a party shall be given due notice and has the right to be present, to be represented by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses, and to introduce evidence.

Members of a court of inquiry may be challenged by a party, but only for cause stated to the court.

The members, the counsel, the reporter, and the interpreters of courts of inquiry shall take an oath or affirmation to faithfully perform their duties.

Witnesses may be summoned to appear and testify and may be examined before courts of inquiry in the same manner as provided for courts-martial.

Courts of inquiry shall make findings of fact but may not express opinions or make recommendations unless required to do so by the convening authority.

Each court of inquiry shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be authenticated by the signatures of the president and counsel for the court and forwarded to the convening authority. If the record cannot be authenticated by the president, it shall be signed by a member of the court in lieu of the president. If the record cannot be authenticated by the counsel for the court, it shall be signed by a member of the court in lieu of the counsel.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1193, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 362, § 24, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 121, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

28-3.1-602. Authority to administer oaths.

The following members of the military forces may administer oaths for the purposes of military justice, and affidavits may be taken for those purposes before such members or before persons having the general powers of a notary public:

The state judge advocate general and all assistant state judge advocates;

All summary courts-martial members;

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting adjutants, and personnel adjutants;

All commanding officers;

The president, military judge, trial counsel, and assistant trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial;

The president and counsel for the court of any court of inquiry;

All officers designated to take a deposition;

All persons detailed to conduct an investigation; and

All other persons designated by regulations of the governor.

Officers of the state military forces may not be authorized to administer oaths as provided in this section unless they are on duty in or with those forces under orders of the governor as prescribed in this code.

The signature without seal of any person designated in this section, together with the title of his or her office, is prima facie evidence of his or her authority.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1193, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 620, § 120, effective May 24.

28-3.1-603. Sections to be explained.

Sections of this code shall be carefully explained to every person at the time of his or her enlistment, appointment, transfer, or induction into or at the time of his or her order to duty in or with any of the state military forces or within ninety days thereafter. A complete text of this code and of the regulations prescribed by the governor thereunder shall be made available to any member of the state military forces, upon his or her request, for his or her personal examination. The requirements of this section are binding on all persons administering this code, but failure to follow them shall not divest a military court of jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1194, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1015, § 5, effective May 3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 121, effective May 24.

28-3.1-604. Complaints of wrongs.

Any member of the state military forces who believes himself or herself wronged by a commanding officer, and who, upon due application to that commanding officer, is refused redress, may complain to any superior commissioned officer, who shall forward the complaint to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the officer against whom it is made. The officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction shall examine into the complaint and take proper measures for redressing the wrong complained of, and shall, as soon as possible, send to the adjutant general a true statement of that complaint, with the proceedings had thereon.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1194, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 86, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2018:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 751, § 32, effective April 2.

28-3.1-605. Redress of injuries to property.

Whenever complaint is made to any commanding officer that willful damage has been done to the property of any person or that his or her property has been wrongfully taken by members of the state military forces, said commanding officer may, subject to such regulations as the governor may prescribe, convene a board to investigate the complaint. The board shall consist of one to three commissioned officers and, for the purpose of that investigation, the board has power to summon witnesses and examine them under oath, to receive depositions or other documentary evidence, and to assess the damages sustained against the responsible parties. The assessment of damages made by the board is subject to the approval of the commanding officer and, in the amount approved by the commanding officer, shall be charged against the pay of the offenders. The order of the commanding officer directing such charges is conclusive on any disbursing officer for the payment by him or her to the injured parties of the damages so assessed and approved.

If the offenders cannot be ascertained, but the organization or detachment to which they belong is known, charges totaling the amount of damages assessed and approved may be made in such proportion as may be considered just upon the individual members thereof who are shown to have been present at the scene at the time the damages complained of were inflicted, as determined by the approved findings of the board.

Any person subject to this code who is accused of causing willful damage to property has the right to be represented by counsel, to summon witnesses in his or her behalf, and to cross-examine those appearing against him or her.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1194, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 621, § 122, effective May 24.

28-3.1-606. Presumption of jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the military courts and boards established by this code shall be presumed, and the burden of proof rests on any person seeking to invalidate the jurisdiction of those courts or boards of jurisdiction in any action or proceeding.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1195, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-607. Delegation of authority by the governor.

The governor may delegate any authority vested in him or her under this code.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1195, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 621, § 123, effective May 24.